Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1242.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 56APUBLIC HEALTH NOTIFICATION PROGRAMSSubchapterA. (Reserved)B. (Reserved)C. Bone Marrow Donor Recruitment ProgramSUBCHAPTER A(Reserved)SUBCHAPTER B(Reserved)123456789101112131415161718 SUBCHAPTER CBONE MARROW DONOR RECRUITMENT PROGRAMSec.56A21. Definitions.56A22. Bone marrow donor recruitment program.56A23. Regulations.§ 56A21. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Biomarker." A blood protein, such as a human erythrocyte glycoprotein, a human blood rhesus factor antigen, a human leukocyte antigen or other organic compound found in blood as determined by the department which may be used diagnostically to determine the compatibility or viability of donor tissue for the donation recipient."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.§ 56A22. Bone marrow donor recruitment program.(a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a bone marrow donor recruitment program to educate residents of this Commonwealth on the following:(1) The need for bone marrow donors who meet the eligibility criteria established by the National Marrow Donor Program from every ethnic background and necessary blood compatibility biomarker grouping.(2) The requirements for registering as a potential bone marrow donor with the federally authorized bone marrow donor registry established and maintained by the National Marrow Donor Program, including procedures for determining an individual's tissue type.20250HB1242PN1391 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The collection procedures an individual must undergo to donate bone marrow or other sources of blood stem cells.(4) The availability of information about bone marrow donation in health care facilities, blood banks and driver's license offices.(b) Electronic informational materials.--The department, in consultation with the National Marrow Donor Program, shall develop electronic informational materials, including content for publicly accessible Internet websites of State agencies and machine-readable codes, including:(1) Bone marrow donation.(2) The process of registering with the National Marrow Donor Program's bone marrow donor registry.(c) Dissemination of informational materials.--(1) The department shall post the information under subsection (b) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall, in collaboration with the Department of Transportation, display the information electronically.(2) A health care facility, blood bank or publicly accessible office of the Department of Transportation may print, post or electronically display the materials under subsection (b) in its facilities.§ 56A23. Regulations.The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this subchapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1242PN1391 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627